Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB840.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2599.4 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 2599.4. Targeted Industry Cluster Certificate Scholarship Program.--(a) The Targeted Industry Cluster Certificate Scholarship Program is established within the [Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency] agency.(b) The agency may use funds appropriated to provide grants for defraying the necessary expense of residents of this Commonwealth who are eligible students pursuing an eligible [course] program of study at an eligible educational provider.1234567891011121314151617181920 (c) The agency shall determine and approve student eligibility and educational provider eligibility requirements for the program.(d) The Department of Education shall consult with the Department of Labor and Industry to identify programs of study that train individuals for areas of immediate workforce need and provide the agency with a list of eligible programs of study.(e) Grant awards shall be established by the agency based upon available resources.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Higher Education Assistance Agency."Eligible program of study." An education program that:(1) takes two or fewer years to complete;(2) takes four or fewer years to complete as determined by the agency under subsection (c); or(3) is one of the following:(i) A bachelor of science program in nursing.(ii) A bachelor of arts program or bachelor of science program in public health.(iii) A bachelor of arts program or bachelor of science program in community health.(iv) A pre-physician-assistant education program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0840PN0870 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425